Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1209
Boundaries; petition; changes authorized.

A petition to reorganize educational service units may include the following:

(1) A transfer of a school district or districts from one established educational service unit to another established educational service unit;

(2) A withdrawal from an established educational service unit by two or more school districts to form a new educational service unit;

(3) An addition of a school district or districts which are not part of an educational service unit to an established or new educational service unit; and

(4) The dissolution of one or more entire educational service units for attachment to existing educational service units or the merger of two or more educational service units into a new educational service unit.

Laws 1987, LB 688, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2202.06;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 926;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 58.